California statutes. Water Code
-------------------------------------------

9379.

A list of the ballots cast shall be made by the board of election, containing the name of each voter, and if the ballot is cast by proxy, the name of the person casting it, the number of votes cast by each voter and whether they are cast for or against the issuing of the bonds.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Canvass and Contest [9385. - 9389.]

9385.

The polls at each polling place for the election shall be kept open from 9 o'clock in the forenoon until 5 o'clock in the afternoon of the day appointed for the election.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

9386.

At the close of the polls the board of election shall deliver to the elections official all ballots, voting lists, lists of ballots cast at the election, and all documents and paper used at the election. The county elections official shall do both of the following:

(a) Proceed to canvass the votes and declare the result.

(b) Prepare a certificate showing the result and the number of votes cast for and against the issuing of bonds to the board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 221, Sec. 151.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

9387.

The board shall examine and canvass the certificates received from the boards of election, and shall determine therefrom and declare, and enter in its minutes as the managing body of the drainage district, the total result of the election.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

9388.

Any person interested may within 10 days after the result of the election has been determined and declared by the board, contest the election so far and to such an extent as the contest depends upon the votes or proceedings had in the matter of the election in any county, by bringing suit in the superior court of that county.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

9389.

If no contest is commenced within the time mentioned in the next preceding section, the declaration of the result by the board is final and conclusive.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 6. Bonds [9395. - 9527.]



  ARTICLE 1. In General [9395. - 9405.]

9395.

If a majority of the votes cast at the bond election are in favor of the issuance of bonds, the board shall cause bonds of the drainage district, in the amount stated in the order calling the election, to be prepared and executed and delivered to the State Treasurer.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

9396.

The bonds shall be of the denomination of not less than one hundred dollars ($100) nor more than one thousand dollars ($1,000) each.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

9397.

The bonds shall be signed by the president of the board, attested by its secretary with the seal of the board affixed thereto, numbered consecutively in the order of their maturity, and shall bear date either January 1st or July 1st.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

9398.

The bonds shall bear interest at a rate to be fixed by the order of the board for issuance of the bonds not to exceed 6 per cent per annum payable semiannually on the first day of January and the first day of July in each year, at the office of the State Treasurer upon presentation of the proper coupons therefor.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

9399.

Coupons for each installment of interest shall be attached to the bonds and shall bear the facsimile signature of the Controller.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

9400.

Whenever any of the bonds are sold or delivered by the State Treasurer either to a purchaser thereof or upon an order from the board payable in such bonds, the State Treasurer shall first detach therefrom and cancel all past due interest coupons and deliver the canceled coupons to the board or its secretary.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

9401.

The State Treasurer shall certify and deliver to the board or its secretary a list of bonds sold or delivered, showing the serial numbers, denominations, date of maturity, the price received for each bond sold, and the date of maturity of the earliest maturing interest coupon left attached to each bond.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

9402.

The State Treasurer shall certify and deliver to the board or its secretary, whenever requested, a statement of all bonds and coupons for interest thereon paid by him and of all bonds or coupons presented for payment and not paid for want of funds, with the date of presentation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

9403.

The bonds of the drainage district issued pursuant to this part which are investigated and approved by any commission or officer authorized by any law of this state to conduct the investigation and give the approval and by authority of which approval the bonds are declared to be legal investments for savings banks, may be lawfully purchased or received in pledge for loans by any of the following who hold funds which they are permitted by law to invest or loan:

(a) Banks.

(b) Trust companies.

(c) Insurance companies.

(d) Guardians and conservators.

(e) Executors.

(f) Administrators and special administrators.

(g) Any public officer or officers of this state or of any county, city, or city and county, or other municipality or corporate body within this state.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 730.)
-------------------------------------------

9404.

If within one year from the time bonds are authorized to be issued as provided in this part, the bonds are not sold or disposed of, the board may at its discretion by an order duly made and entered in its minutes and a copy duly certified sent to the county treasurer of each county wherein lands affected by the assessment are situated, cancel all proceedings taken in connection with the bond issue.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

9405.

The board may thereafter call for the payment of the assessment in such installments from time to time as it shall determine and as provided in Part 4 of this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Form of Bond [9410. - 9411.]

9410.

The bonds may be substantially in the following form:UNITED STATES OF AMERICANo. _________STATE OF CALIFORNIA$ __________SACRAMENTO AND SAN JOAQUIN DRAINAGE DISTRICTSacramento and San Joaquin Drainage
 District, in the State of California, for value received, hereby acknowledges itself indebted to and promises to pay to the holder hereof at the office of the State Treasurer of the State of California, on the first day of ____, 19__, the sum of $____ dollars in lawful money of the United States of America, with interest thereon in like lawful money from date hereof until paid at the rate of ____ per cent per annum, payable at the office of the State Treasurer semiannually on the first day of January and the first day of July in each year on presentation and surrender of the interest coupons hereto attached. This bond is one of a series of ____ bonds of like tenor and effect, except as to denomination and maturity, numbered from ____ to ____, inclusive, amounting in the aggregate to $____ issued in accordance with ______ authorizing the same, and is based upon and secured by an assessment levied on lands in the drainage district known and designated as (name and number of assessment), validated by a judgment
 of the Superior Court of the State of California, in and for the County of ____, on the ____ day of ____, 19__, and filed in the respective offices of the county treasurers of the counties wherein are situated the lands assessed thereby. And the Sacramento and San Joaquin Drainage District does hereby certify and declare that the issuance of these bonds was duly authorized by an election duly called and held upon due notice, and the result thereof was duly canvassed and ascertained in pursuance of and in strict conformity with the laws of the State of California applicable thereto, and that all the acts and conditions and things required by law to be done precedent to and in the issuance of the bonds have been done and performed in regular and due form and in strict accordance with the provisions of law authorizing the issuance of the bonds of the Sacramento and San Joaquin Drainage District.

IN WITNESS WHEREOF, The Sacramento and San Joaquin Drainage District,
 acting through the Reclamation Board of the State, has caused this bond to be signed by the president of the Reclamation Board and attested by the secretary of the board with the seal of the board affixed, this ____ day of ______, 19__. President of said Reclamation Board.Attest:Secretary of Reclamation Board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

9411.

The interest coupons may be substantially in the following form: No.$The Treasurer of the State of California will pay to the holder 
hereof on the ____ day of ____, 19__, at his office in the City 
of Sacramento, State of California, the sum of ____ dollars 
($____) in lawful money of the United States, out of the funds of 
the Sacramento and San Joaquin Drainage District applicable 
thereto, for interest on bond of the district numbered ____.Attest:State Controller.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Validating Proceedings [9415. - 9415.]

9415.

An action to determine the validity of bonds may be brought pursuant to Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 860) of Title 10 of Part 2 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 1537.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Sale of Bonds [9440. - 9450.]

9440.

The State Treasurer shall receive and place the bonds to the credit of the drainage district, and shall when and as directed by the board sell any of the bonds for the best price obtainable.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

9441.

The bonds shall not be sold for less than 95 per cent of their face value and the accrued interest thereon.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

9442.

Before making a sale of any of the bonds, notice shall be given by the State Treasurer that he will sell a specified amount of the bonds, stating the day, hour and place of the sale.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

9443.

The notice shall state that sealed proposals will be received by him for the purchase of the bonds or any part thereof at the day and hour named in the notice.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

9444.

The notice shall be given by publication once a week for three successive weeks in a newspaper of general circulation published in the City of Sacramento.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

9445.

At the time and place appointed in the notice the State Treasurer shall open the bids and shall award the purchase of the bonds or any part thereof to the highest responsible bidder.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

9446.

If the highest bid is not equal to par and accrued interest the State Treasurer shall notify the board of the amounts of the highest bids received, and reject any or all bids if so required by the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

9447.

At any time before all the bonds held by the State Treasurer have been sold by him, the board may:

(a) Draw upon the State Treasurer for, and issue and deliver any unsold bonds at not less than their face value in payment for any of the works or other expenses for which the assessment has been levied and for which bonds have been authorized.

(b) Make contracts for any of the works or expenses, payable in whole or in part in bonds.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

9448.

In making payments in bonds, the board shall draw orders upon the State Treasurer payable in bonds to the amount therein named.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

9449.

The orders shall be countersigned by the Controller and shall be paid with bonds by the State Treasurer upon presentation to the amount therein provided for.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

9450.

In drawing any order upon the State Treasurer payable in bonds, the board may specify the maturity of the bonds which are to be delivered in compliance with the order and the specifications shall be complied with by the State Treasurer as far as possible.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Payment of Principal, Interest and Redemption [9455. - 9461.]

9455.

The principal of the bonds shall, by an order of the board entered in its minutes, be made payable on the first day of July or the first day of January and in such years as the board may prescribe, but all of the bonds shall be payable serially within 20 years from their date.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

9456.

Not less than 10 per cent of the aggregate face value of the bonds shall be payable within 10 years from their date, and not less than 9 per cent of the aggregate face value of the bonds issued shall be payable each year beginning with the eleventh year from their date until the whole amount of the bonds has been paid.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

9457.

The board may call and redeem in their numerical order such an amount of the bonds as it may see fit on any interest date subsequent to the first day of July, 1921, at their face value, with accrued interest to date of redemption.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

9458.

To effect such redemption, the board shall cause to be published once each week for two successive weeks, in a newspaper published in the City of Sacramento, a notice stating that at the next semiannual interest date, the bonds specified in the notice will be redeemed and that there will be due and payable on the bonds at the places specified therein for payment, the amount of the principal thereof with accrued interest.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

9459.

Out of the bond fund of the assessment the State Treasurer shall, on presentation at or after its maturity, pay the holder of each bond or interest coupon which has been sold or which has been issued and delivered upon an order of the board payable in bonds as provided in this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

9460.

If any bond or interest coupon has not been presented to the State Treasurer for payment when it becomes due, it shall cease to bear interest, but if presented at or after such time and not paid for want of funds, the State Treasurer shall indorse the bond or coupon, together with the date of presentation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

9461.

The indorsed bond or coupon shall bear interest at the rate expressed in the bond until paid or until funds have been provided in the State Treasury applicable to its payment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Funds and Warrants [9465. - 9478.]

9465.

The money derived from the sale of any of the bonds shall be received by the State Treasurer and placed to the credit of the following funds in the following manner:

(a) An amount equal to the accrued interest on the bonds so sold to the date of sale shall be placed by the State Treasurer to the credit of the bond fund of the assessment upon which the bonds are based.

(b) All other money derived from the sale of any of the bonds shall be placed to the credit of the drainage district in a fund designated as the “Construction fund of (giving the name and number of the assessment upon which the bonds are based),” and may be drawn and expended upon warrants drawn by the Controller at the request of the board upon and payable out of the construction fund in the same manner as provided in Part 4 of this division, with reference to the expenditure of moneys collected upon assessments.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

9466.

Whenever the drainage district has any money in the bond fund of any assessment which money is not immediately required for the purpose of paying principal or interest on bonds of the assessment, all or any part of it may be invested in bonds of the drainage district based upon and secured by the assessment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

9467.

The investment may be made by the board by direct purchase of the bonds from time to time and in such manner as it determines and at such price or prices as it deems advisable but not to exceed par, plus the accrued interest thereon.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

9468.

Any bonds purchased pursuant to the provisions of this article, and held in the bond fund may from time to time be sold and the proceeds temporarily reinvested in bonds as provided in this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

9469.

Sales of any bonds purchased and held in the bond fund shall from time to time be made so that the proceeds may be applied to the purpose for which the bond fund was created.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

9470.

Any bonds purchased pursuant to the provisions of this article, may be delivered to the State Treasurer for cancellation and the bonds shall thereupon be canceled by the State Treasurer and after cancellation shall cease to be an indebtedness or obligation of the drainage district and the assessment, or either, for any purpose whatsoever.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

9471.

The bond fund of each assessment shall be held by the State Treasurer and shall be applied by him toward the payment of the bonds and coupons thereon based upon the assessment, as the bonds and coupons fall due.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

9472.

If any balance remains in the bond fund of the assessment after payment in full of the principal and interest of all outstanding bonds issued upon the assessment, the balance shall be held for the benefit of the lands upon which the assessment was made and in proportion to the amounts assessed thereon.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

9473.

The balance may be distributed by the board to the owners or other persons interested in the lands.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

9474.

The board shall from time to time when necessary, present its written request to the Controller for the issuance of warrants for the purpose of paying the cost and expenses of the works or project, for which the assessment was levied, and the expenses of making, bonding and collecting the assessment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

9475.

The board’s request shall specify the amount of the warrant and the name of the payee thereof and upon receipt of the request the Controller shall draw his warrants upon the State Treasurer payable out of the Construction Fund of the assessment upon which the bonds are issued.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

9476.

The State Treasurer shall pay the warrants or make delivery of the bonds as provided in this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

9477.

Warrants issued by the Controller and payable out of the assessment as provided by Part 4 of this division shall be paid by the State Treasurer out of and only out of the Construction Fund of the assessment, and in their proper order of registration.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

9478.

No warrant issued pursuant to any of the provisions of this part or of Part 4 of this division shall be accepted or received by the county treasurer in payment of all or any part of any assessment upon which bonds have been authorized.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. Annual Installments [9485. - 9497.]

9485.

Upon the sale of any of the bonds of the drainage district based upon any assessment levied by the board, as provided by this part, the board shall annually thereafter, by an order entered in its minutes ascertain and determine the total amount necessary to be collected upon the assessment for the payment of principal and interest of all bonds which will or may become due on the two semiannual due dates next succeeding the date of the order.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

9486.

The board may also in the order fix and determine upon such additional sum as the board deems proper to be collected to provide a sinking fund for the retirement of bonds on or before maturity.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

9487.

Immediately upon making the order the board shall prepare in duplicate, retaining one original, and causing the other original to be certified by its secretary or assistant secretary and delivered to the county treasurer of each county wherein are situated any of the lands covered by the assessment, a statement of the amount of the assessment necessary to be collected for the year to pay the principal and interest of the bonds falling due.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

9488.

To the assessment referred to in the preceding section shall be added and collected an additional amount of 15 per cent of the amount to cover possible delinquencies.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

9489.

The statement provided for in Section 9487 shall also include, and there shall be added and collected, such additional sum as the board in its order may have fixed and determined upon to provide a sinking fund for the redemption of bonds on or before maturity.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

9490.

The amount necessary to pay the interest and principal, or either, falling due, together with the additional 15 per cent of that amount and the amount for sinking fund purposes, shall constitute the amount to be collected and paid into the bond fund and shall be known as the installment for bonds.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

9491.

Unless otherwise determined by the board or by an order entered in its minutes, a copy of which duly certified shall be transmitted to the county treasurer of each of the counties wherein are situated any of the lands covered by the assessment, the installment for bonds shall be payable in two equal portions, the first of which shall be due and payable to the county treasurers, respectively, on the third Monday in October and is delinquent on the first Monday in December next thereafter at 6 o'clock p.m. and the remaining portion may be paid at any time before the last Monday in April next thereafter at 6 o'clock p.m. at which time the installment is delinquent.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

9492.

For convenience in entering payments of the installment for bonds, the board shall furnish to the county treasurer of each county affected, an annual collection list setting forth the following:

(a) The reference number of each tract of land assessed.

(b) The name of the owner to whom assessed, as stated in the original assessment list.

(c) The total amount assessed upon each tract and the amount to be collected thereon for that year.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

9493.

The list shall contain appropriate columns for the entry of payments, sales and redemptions.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

9494.

The county treasurer shall enter on the annual collection list in the proper column the following:

(a) All payments, with date of payment.

(b) The word “sold” with date of sale, in case of sales for delinquency.

(c) The words “sold to the district” with the date of sale, in the case of sales to the district.

(d) The word “redeemed,” with date of payment, in case redemption is made.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

9495.

The county treasurer shall make a report to the board as often as requested of all entries made by him on the collection list.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

9496.

When either portion of any installment for bonds becomes delinquent, a penalty of one dollar ($1) together with 20 per cent of the amount of the installment on each tract delinquent, shall be added thereto and collected for the use of the bond fund of the assessment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

9497.

All money collected by the several county treasurers upon the installment for bonds or for the penalty thereon in case of delinquency shall, within 30 days after collection, be paid over to the State Treasurer and credited to the bond fund of the assessment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 8. Bond Record [9505. - 9506.]

9505.

The board shall maintain in its office and open to public inspection at all reasonable times during office hours, a book or books to be known as the bond record of the drainage district, containing a complete record of the existing condition of the whole of each bond issued as compiled from time to time from reports from the State Treasurer, from which can be ascertained the amount of bonds outstanding and the interest accumulated and unpaid thereon.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

9506.

In case there are several bond issues under this part based upon several different assessments all of the proceedings, records and transactions of every kind provided for by this part shall be had and kept separately with reference to each bond issue.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 9. Refunding Bonds [9510. - 9527.]

9510.

The board may, by resolution entered in its minutes, order the refunding of the whole or any part of the principal of any bond issue now or hereafter outstanding at lower rates of interest whenever in its judgment and opinion it will be for the best interests of the owners of lands assessed by the assessment to be refunded so to do.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

9511.

Refunding bonds may be issued for the purpose, and when issued their proceeds may be used to refund outstanding bonds either as they mature or to call and redeem outstanding bonds as provided in this part, or both.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

9512.

The resolution ordering refunding of bonds shall designate the numbers, denominations, dates of maturity and aggregate principal amounts of the bonds to be refunded, and shall fix and prescribe the form of the refunding bonds and of the interest coupons attached thereto, and shall fix the rate of interest the bonds shall bear, which rate, however, shall be less than the rate provided in the bonds to be refunded.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

9513.

Refunding bonds shall mature serially in amounts to be fixed by the board in its resolution.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

9514.

The payment of the refunding bonds shall begin not later than five years from the date thereof and shall be completed in not more than 25 years from the date thereof.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

9515.

The refunding bonds, together with interest thereon, shall be payable at the office of the State Treasurer.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

9516.

Refunding bonds shall be issued in such denominations as the board may determine except that no bonds shall be of a denomination of less than one hundred dollars ($100) nor of a greater denomination than one thousand dollars ($1,000), and shall be payable on the day fixed in the bonds with interest at the rate specified therein which interest shall be payable semiannually.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

9517.

The refunding bonds shall be signed by the president of the board or such other member of the board as the board may by resolution designate and shall be countersigned by the secretary of the board with the seal of the board affixed thereto.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

9518.

The interest coupons of the refunding bonds shall be numbered consecutively and signed by the secretary of the board by his engraved or lithographed signature.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

9519.

In case any officer whose signature or countersignature appears on the refunding bonds or coupons ceases to be such officer before the delivery of the bonds to the purchaser, the signature or countersignature shall nevertheless be valid and sufficient for all purposes the same as if the officer had remained in office until the delivery of the bonds.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

9520.

The refunding bonds may be issued and sold by the board as it may determine but for not less than their par value and accrued interest thereon.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

9521.

The proceeds of the refunding bonds shall be placed in the State Treasury to the credit of the drainage district in the bond fund of the assessment upon which the bonds are based, and the proceeds shall be used and applied for the objects and purposes for which the refunding bonds were issued.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

9522.

The proceeds may also be used to defray the expenses of refinancing the obligations.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

9523.

The principal and interest of the refunding bonds shall be based upon, secured by and payable out of the assessment or assessments upon which the bonds refunded were payable in accordance with the provisions of this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

9524.

Upon the sale of any of the refunding bonds, installments of the assessment upon which the bonds are based shall be called and collected and the installments shall become delinquent, with the penalties, provisions for sale, redemption and conveyancing all as set forth in this part, which provisions apply to the refunding bond issues to the same extent as to original issues.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

9525.

The refunding bonds or any part thereof when sold may be called and redeemed by the board in the manner provided by Chapter 6 of this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

9526.

The refunding bonds issued by the drainage district pursuant to this part shall be legal investments for all trust funds and for the funds of all insurance companies, banks, both commercial and savings, and trust companies, and for the State school funds, and whenever any moneys or funds may by law now or hereafter enacted be invested in bonds of cities, cities and counties, counties or school districts, in the State, such moneys or funds may be invested in the bonds of the drainage district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

9527.

Whenever bonds of cities, cities and counties, counties or school districts may by law be issued as security for the performance of any act or as security for the deposit of public funds of the State or of any county, city and county, municipality or other public corporation or political subdivision in any State or National bank or banks, refunding bonds of the drainage district may be so used.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 7. Sale of Land for Delinquent Installments [9535. - 9577.]



  ARTICLE 1. Notice and Sale [9535. - 9544.]

9535.

If both portions of the installments, levied pursuant to Chapter 6 of this part, are not paid before the last Monday in April at 6 o'clock p.m., the board shall publish in each county where the delinquencies exist, in one notice, a list of all the delinquencies in the county at least once a week for two weeks successively in some newspaper of general circulation published in the county.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

9536.

The notice shall contain the following:

(a) A description of each parcel of land assessed within the county whereon an installment or installments are delinquent, as such description appears on the assessment list.

(b) The name of the owner to whom the parcel is assessed or a statement that it is assessed to unknown owners if such be the fact.

(c) The amount of the installment or installments delinquent on the parcel, and the amount of the penalty thereon.

(d) A notice that each of the parcels will be sold at public auction by the county treasurer in front of the courthouse of the county at a specified day and hour.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

9537.

The sale shall be held not less than 30 days nor more than 90 days from the date of delinquency.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

9538.

At the time and place stated in the notice the county treasurer shall sell each parcel of land described in the notice to the highest bidder unless prior thereto he has received payment in full of the delinquent installment or installments together with the penalty.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

9539.

No bid for any parcel shall be accepted less than the aggregate sum then due for the installment or installments thereon, together with the penalty, except that the county treasurer may receive from any purchaser at their face value, in lieu of cash, bonds of the drainage district issued upon the assessment, or their interest coupons, if the bonds or coupons are then matured or will mature within one year after such sale.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

9540.

Any bonds or coupons so received in payment shall be canceled by the county treasurer and transmitted to the State Treasurer.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

9541.

If the entire amount of any bond or coupon tendered in payment is not required to complete payment of the purchase money, the county treasurer shall indorse thereon as paid the amount of the purchase money credited thereon.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

9542.

The bond fund of the assessment shall be credited with the amount of purchase money paid in bonds or coupons on delinquent sales, and of all sums indorsed as paid upon account of purchase money on any bonds or coupons, specifying the same, a statement of which shall be furnished by the county treasurer to the State Treasurer.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

9543.

The county treasurer shall execute to each purchaser at the delinquent sale including the drainage district, a certificate of sale, which shall be recorded by the purchaser in the county recorder’s office of the county in which the land is situated.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

9544.

The county treasurer may if directed by the board postpone the delinquent sale from time to time for not less than 10 nor more than 30 days by a written notice posted at the place of sale.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Purchase and Sale of Land by the Drainage District [9550. - 9558.]

9550.

If no bid is made for any parcel at the delinquent sale equal to the amount of installment or installments delinquent thereon, including the penalty, the county treasurer shall bid in and sell the parcel to the drainage district for the amount of the installment or installments and penalty.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

9551.

Any parcel of land bid in and purchased by the drainage district at the delinquent sale shall be held in trust for the bond fund of the assessment upon which the land was sold and may be sold and conveyed by the board at any time after the expiration of the redemption period of one year at public or private sale, with or without notice to any person paying not less than the amount for which the parcel was bid in by the county treasurer at the delinquent sale, with interest thereon at the rate of 12 per cent per annum compounded yearly from the date of the delinquent sale, and also the amount of all subsequent installments then delinquent, with accrued interest and penalties thereon.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

9552.

Payment for the land purchased under the next preceding section may be made by the purchaser either in cash or matured bonds and coupons issued upon assessment taken at their face value.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

9553.
